Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-142 Requirements for license and renewal. (a) Applicants
seeking licensure under this part shall comply with applicable licensing
requirements under chapter 431.

(b) The commissioner may issue a limited lines
motor vehicle rental company producer license to a motor vehicle rental
company; provided that:

(1) A motor vehicle rental company having a limited
lines motor vehicle rental company producer's license shall also authorize
employees of the motor vehicle rental company to act individually on behalf of,
and under the supervision of, the motor vehicle rental company in solicitation
and sale of insurance coverages;

(2) Except as set forth in this section, a limited
lines motor vehicle rental company producer and its employees shall not advertise
or otherwise represent themselves as licensed insurers, insurance agents,
insurance producers, or insurance brokers;

(3) A limited lines motor vehicle rental company
producer may solicit or sell insurance at the rental office or by preselecting
coverages in master, corporate, group rental, or individual agreements in any
of the following general categories:

(A) Personal accident insurance covering the
risks of travel to the motor vehicle renter and other occupants of the rental
vehicle for accident and health or sickness insurance covering accidental death
or dismemberment and reimbursement for medical expenses resulting from an
occurrence during the rental period;

(B) Liability insurance, uninsured motorist
insurance, or underinsured motorist insurance covering the motor vehicle renter
and other authorized drivers of the rental vehicle for liability and damage
arising from the operation of the rental vehicle;

(C) Personal effects insurance covering the
motor vehicle renter and other vehicle occupants for the loss of or damage to
personal effects that occur during the rental period;

(D) Roadside assistance and emergency
sickness protection programs; and

(E) Incidental travel or vehicle related
coverages, which the motor vehicle rental company solicits or sells in
connection with the rental of its vehicles;

(4) The limited lines motor vehicle rental company
producer shall have brochures or other written materials readily available for
review and dissemination to prospective motor vehicle renters that:

(A) Summarize clearly and correctly the
material terms of coverages solicited or sold by the motor vehicle rental
company producer, including the identity of the insurer;

(B) Disclose that the coverages solicited by
the motor vehicle rental company producer may provide a duplication of
coverages already provided by a renter's personal motor vehicle insurance
policy or other sources of coverage;

(C) State that purchases by the motor vehicle
renter of the kinds of coverages offered by the motor vehicle rental company
producer is not required to rent a vehicle; and

(D) Describe the process for filing a claim
if the renter elects to purchase coverages;

(5) The motor vehicle rental company producer shall
disclose in the motor vehicle rental agreement evidence of insurance coverages
elected or declined by the motor vehicle renter;

(6) The motor vehicle rental company producer shall
conduct training programs for its employees who solicit and sell the rental
company producer's insurance coverages;

(7) The motor vehicle rental company producer shall
not be required to hold funds collected as payments for insurance in a separate
trust account; and

(8) The motor vehicle rental company producer shall
comply with all provisions of chapter 437D.

(c) The commissioner may prescribe, approve, or furnish
forms calling for any information that the commissioner deems proper in
connection with the application for or extension of these limited licenses.

(d) The limited license shall not be issued
until all applicable licensing fees required by article 7 have been paid. [L 2002, c 235, pt
of §1; am L 2003, c 212, §69; am L 2006, c 154, §32]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next